Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.470

Vulnerable youth committed to residential facilities—Protection from sexually aggressive youth—Assessment process.

(1) The department shall implement a policy for protecting youth committed to state-operated or state-funded residential facilities under this chapter who are vulnerable to sexual victimization by other youth committed to those facilities who are sexually aggressive. The policy shall include, at a minimum, the following elements:

(a) Development and use of an assessment process for identifying youth, within thirty days of commitment to the department, who present a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior for the purposes of this section. The assessment process need not require that every youth who is adjudicated or convicted of a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 be determined to be sexually aggressive, nor shall a sex offense adjudication or conviction be required in order to determine a youth is sexually aggressive. Instead, the assessment process shall consider the individual circumstances of the youth, including his or her age, physical size, sexual abuse history, mental and emotional condition, and other factors relevant to sexual aggressiveness. The definition of "sexually aggressive youth" in RCW 74.13.075 does not apply to this section to the extent that it conflicts with this section;

(b) Development and use of an assessment process for identifying youth, within thirty days of commitment to the department, who may be vulnerable to victimization by youth identified under (a) of this subsection as presenting a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior. The assessment process shall consider the individual circumstances of the youth, including his or her age, physical size, sexual abuse history, mental and emotional condition, and other factors relevant to vulnerability;

(c) Development and use of placement criteria to avoid assigning youth who present a moderate or high risk of sexually aggressive behavior to the same sleeping quarters as youth assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization, except that they may be assigned to the same multiple-person sleeping quarters if those sleeping quarters are regularly monitored by visual surveillance equipment or staff checks;

(d) Development and use of procedures for minimizing, within available funds, unsupervised contact in state-operated or state-funded residential facilities between youth presenting moderate to high risk of sexually aggressive behavior and youth assessed as vulnerable to sexual victimization. The procedures shall include taking reasonable steps to prohibit any youth committed under this chapter who present a moderate to high risk of sexually aggressive behavior from entering any sleeping quarters other than the one to which they are assigned, unless accompanied by an authorized adult.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) "Sleeping quarters" means the bedrooms or other rooms within a residential facility where youth are assigned to sleep.

(b) "Unsupervised contact" means contact occurring outside the sight or hearing of a responsible adult for more than a reasonable period of time under the circumstances.

[ 1997 c 386 s 50.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—1997 c 386 ss 50-55: "The legislature finds that the placement of children and youth in state-operated or state-funded residential facilities must be done in such a manner as to protect children who are vulnerable to sexual victimization from youth who are sexually aggressive. To achieve this purpose, the legislature intends the department of social and health services to develop a policy for assessing sexual aggressiveness and vulnerability to sexual victimization of children and youth who are placed in state-operated or state-funded residential facilities." [ 1997 c 386 s 49.]